src-fst-morphology-stems-numerals.lexc.md
# Inari Saami numerals

## Main lexicon

* **LEXICON Numeral**

## The million layer

* **LEXICON HUNDREDSM**

* **LEXICON CUODIM**

* **LEXICON HUNDREDM**

* **LEXICON TEENSM**

* **LEXICON TEENM**

* **LEXICON LOHKAIM**

* **LEXICON TENSM**

* **LEXICON LOGIM**

* **LEXICON ONESM**

* **LEXICON MILJON**

## The under the million

In principle as the above.

* **LEXICON OVERTHOUSANDS**

* **LEXICON HUNDREDST**

* **LEXICON TWOCUODIT**

* **LEXICON SEVENCUODIT**

* **LEXICON HUNDREDT**  X = 1-9, Y = 0-9

* **LEXICON TEENST**

* **LEXICON TEENT**

* **LEXICON LOHKAIT**

* **LEXICON TENST**

* **LEXICON LOGIT**

* **LEXICON ONEST**

* **LEXICON THOUSANDS**

* **LEXICON TWOST**

* **LEXICON SEVENST**

* **LEXICON TWOTHOUSANDS** 2000 - 6999

* **LEXICON SEVENTHOUSANDS** 7000 - 9999

* **LEXICON THOUSAND**

# Here starts the 999 numbers

* **LEXICON UNDERTHOUSAND**

* **LEXICON HUNDREDS** 200-999

* **LEXICON KULMACUODI** maaŋgâi

* **LEXICON VITTACUODI**

* **LEXICON KULMA_VITTACUODI**

* **LEXICON CICCAMCUODI** 700-900 with +Par, we comment Par out

* **LEXICON CUODI** to be emptied for *CYEDE

* **LEXICON HUNDRED**

* **LEXICON TEENS**

* **LEXICON TEEN**

* **LEXICON LOHKAI**

* **LEXICON LOGAAT**

## Under hundred

### Numeral agreement, an overview
Gen' means shortened forms, lov = the ten denominator
- Nominative: Nom + lov + Nom
- Genitive: Gen' + lov + Gen
- Illative: Gen' + lohán + Ill
- Locative: Gen' + lov + Loc
- Comitative: Com + lov-Com + Com
- Essive: Ess + lov-Ess + Com

- Gen' =

* **LEXICON TENS**

* **LEXICON LOGI** pointing to tens (LOV) and numbers (ONES)

* **LEXICON ONES** to card and ord

* **LEXICON CARDINAL** this is 1-10

* **LEXICON MISCNUM**

* **LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS**   arabic as first part,

* **LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS**: numeral as first part: duhatjienat,
logigielat, etc. 2nd part in affixes/adjectives.lexc

* **LEXICON ORDINAL**

* __LEXICON ARABIC-COLL__

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc)</small>
